Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1185.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 15, 1982 (P.L.1291, No.292), known as the Medicare Supplement Insurance Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 4.1. Annual open enrollment period.(a) An insurer shall offer to an individual insured under a policy or certificate an annual open enrollment period commencing on the day of the individual's birthday and remaining 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 open for at least 90 days thereafter, during which time the individual may purchase any Medicare supplement policy or certificate made available by an insurer in this Commonwealth that offers the same benefits as those provided by the current coverage. Innovative benefits, as described in 42 U.S.C. § 1395ss(p)(4)(B) (relating to certification of medicare supplemental health insurance policies), shall not be considered when determining whether a Medicare supplement policy or certificate includes the same benefits as those provided by the current coverage.(b) During the annual open enrollment period offered under this section, an issuer may not deny or condition the issuance or effectiveness of a Medicare supplement policy or certificate available for sale in this Commonwealth, nor discriminate in the pricing of a policy or certificate because of the health status, claims history, receipt of health care or medical condition of an individual currently insured under a policy or certificate.(c) At least 15 days but not more than 30 days prior to the commencement of an annual open enrollment period for an individual to whom the open enrollment period established under this section applies, the insurer issuing a Medicare supplement policy or certificate shall notify each individual of:(1) The dates on which the open enrollment period begins and ends.(2) The rights of the individual during the open enrollment period.(3) Any modification of the benefits provided by the policy or certificate under which the individual is currently insured or adjustment of the premiums charged for that policy or certificate.20260SB1185PN1459 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. The provisions of 31 Pa. Code § 89.778 are abrogated insofar as they are inconsistent with the addition of section 4.1 of the act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1185PN1459 - 3 - 1234